Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 9 Superior Court Judges Retirement System; Senior Judges

47-9-1 through 47-9-92.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 586, §§ 1-21, 39, Ga. L. 1977, p. 607, § 1, Ga. L. 1980, p. 925, §§ 9-11, Ga. L. 1981, p. 407, § 1, Ga. L. 1981, p. 1232, §§ 1,2, Ga. L. 1981, p. 1386, § 3, Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 47, Ga. L. 1982, p. 497, §§ 1, 4, Ga. L. 1982, p. 1568, §§ 1-8, Ga. L. 1986, p. 1257, § 1, Ga. L. 1986, p. 1265, § 1, Ga. L. 1986, p. 1326, §§ 1, 2, Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1, Ga. L. 1989, p. 80, § 1, Ga. L. 1989, p. 347, §§ 2-4, Ga. L. 1989, p. 832, § 3, Ga. L. 1990, p. 309, § 1, Ga. L. 1990, p. 516, §§ 1, 2, Ga. L. 1990, p. 550, §§ 1, 2, Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1, Ga. L. 1991, p. 300, § 1, Ga. L. 1991, p. 748, § 1, Ga. L. 1992, p. 1303, § 1, Ga. L. 1993, p. 86, § 1, Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, §§ 18, 19, Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 214, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 298, § 1, Ga. L. 1994, p. 722, § 3, Ga. L. 1995, p. 27, § 1, Ga. L. 1995, p. 651, § 5, Ga. L. 1995, p. 787, § 2, Ga. L. 1996, p. 104, §§ 1, 2, Ga. L. 1996, p. 107, § 1, Ga. L. 1996, p. 1245, § 1, Ga. L. 1998, p. 147, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 2, effective July 1, 1998.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1998, p. 513, § 2 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 1998.